Tennessee, session 114, HB2629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1305, is amended by deleting
the language "monthly" and substituting instead the language "monthly or quarterly".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2629
012966
- 1 -